Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1210
Physician medical director, defined.

Physician medical director means a qualified physician who is responsible for the medical supervision of emergency care providers and verification of skill proficiency of emergency care providers pursuant to section 38-1217.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 494;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 25.